Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

35-33-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Custom Processing of Meat Animals Act".

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1382, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 507, § 3, effective April 16.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-33-101 as it existed prior to 1989.

35-33-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that the purpose of this article is to regulate the slaughter and processing of certain animals intended for human consumption. The general assembly finds that the production, processing, and consumption of meat animals plays an important part in the economy of this state and that to maintain the integrity of this industry and to protect the public health and welfare it is essential that the slaughter and processing of these animals occur in a safe, sanitary, and nondeceptive manner. It is therefore necessary to provide for the regulation of the slaughter and processing of meat animals.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1382, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 507, § 4, effective April 16.

35-33-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adulterated" has the meaning set forth in section 25-5-410, C.R.S.

"Commission" means the state agricultural commission.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture or his or her authorized agent.

"Custom processing" means the slaughter or processing, for a fee or other compensation, of meat or meat products of an animal not owned by the person performing the slaughter or processing and not intended for sale by the owner of the animal.

"Department" means the department of agriculture.

"Food" means all articles used for food, drink, confectionery, or condiment by humans, whether simple, mixed, or compound, and any substance used as a constituent in the manufacture thereof.

"Inedible meat" means meat or meat products derived from dead, dying, disabled, diseased, or condemned animals or from animals whose meat or meat products are otherwise unsuitable for human consumption. "Inedible meat" includes meat or meat products, regardless of origin, that have deteriorated so far as to be unfit for human consumption.

"Meat or meat products" means carcasses or parts of carcasses derived from any animals used for food. "Meat or meat products" includes poultry.

(8.5) "Poultry" means any domesticated bird, including chickens, turkeys, ducks, geese, guineas, or squabs, whether live or dead.

"Premises" means the back, front, and side yard of property occupied by a processing facility; docks and areas where vehicles are loaded or unloaded; driveways, approaches, pens, and alleys; and buildings or portions of buildings that are part of any facility even though not used for processing.

"Processing" means the slaughtering, dressing, cutting, preparing, trimming, wrapping, or packaging of an animal or of meat or meat products from an animal.

"Processing facility" means any establishment where meat is slaughtered, dressed, processed, cut, trimmed, wrapped, or packaged for delivery to consumers.

"Sharp freezing facility" means a facility capable of maintaining a temperature of ten degrees below zero Fahrenheit or lower on still air or contact or a temperature of zero degrees Fahrenheit or lower by forced air circulation, within a tolerance of five degrees Fahrenheit for a minimum of twelve hours after fresh food is put in such facility for freezing.

"Sharp frozen" means the process of refrigeration sufficient to reduce every portion of any meat or meat product to a temperature of zero degrees Fahrenheit or less in five hours or less.

"Slaughter" means any process, or the use of any process, including without limitation the process of bleeding, that causes the death of any animal intended for food.

"Uninspected", in reference to any animal, meat, or meat product, means not inspected and passed by the United States department of agriculture or another authorized government agency.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1382, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 95:

(18) amended, p. 30, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 507, § 5, effective April 16.

L. 2016:

(8) and (9) amended and (8.5) added, (SB 16-058), ch. 158, p. 500, § 2, effective May 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-33-102 as it existed prior to 1989.

35-33-104. Commissioner of agriculture - powers and duties.

The commissioner is hereby authorized to formulate reasonable rules and standards of construction, labeling, operation, record keeping, and sanitation for all processing facilities and shall establish rules and standards pertaining to containers, packaging materials, mobile slaughter units, slaughter rooms, processing rooms, chill rooms, storage and locker rooms, sharp freezing facilities, and premises of processing facilities, with respect to the service of slaughtering, cutting, preparing, wrapping, and packaging meat and meat products necessary for the proper preservation of food.

It is the duty of the department to enforce the provisions of this article and rules, regulations, and standards established in accordance therewith.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 511, § 6, effective April 16, 2009.)

The commissioner, upon consent or upon obtaining an administrative search warrant, shall have the right of access to any premises for the purpose of any examination or inspection necessary to enforce this article or the rules promulgated thereunder, including inspection and copying of any relevant records.

The commissioner may administer oaths and take statements, issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments, and compel the disclosure by such witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation. Upon the failure or refusal of any witness to obey any subpoena, the commissioner may petition the district court, and, upon a proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey such an order of the court shall be punishable as a contempt of court.

The commissioner may, whenever immediate enforcement of any of the provisions of this article is deemed necessary for the protection of the public health or welfare, issue and enforce a written cease-and-desist order to any person found in violation of any of the provisions of this article or the rules promulgated thereunder.

When the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe that any meat or meat product is being held, slaughtered, or processed in violation of this article or the rules promulgated under this article, and when such product endangers the public health, safety, or welfare, he or she may issue and enforce a written retention order, prohibiting any person from moving or otherwise disposing of the retained product in any manner without written permission of the commissioner. Within five days after the issuance of any retention order, the commissioner shall hold a hearing to determine whether the retained product should be condemned or released to the owner. If the product is found to be adulterated, and the product cannot be brought into compliance with this article, the commissioner shall order that the retained product is inedible meat and shall be disposed of.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 1995.)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1386, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 90:

(7) added, p. 333, § 22, effective April 3.

L. 95:

(1) and (7) amended, p. 31, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) and (3) to (6) amended, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 511, § 6, effective April 16.

L. 2013:

(6) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1698, § 110, effective August 7.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-058), ch. 158, p. 500, § 3, effective May 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-33-103 and 35-33-106 as they existed prior to 1989.

Cross references:

For rule-making and licensing procedures, see article 4 of title 24.

35-33-105. Injunctive relief.

Whenever the commissioner possesses sufficient evidence satisfactory to him or her indicating that any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this article or of any rule promulgated under this article, the commissioner may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this article or any rule or order under this article. In any such action, the commissioner shall not be required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of the remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1387, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 512, § 7, effective April 16.

35-33-106. Delegation of duties - cooperative agreements.

The powers and duties vested in the commissioner by this article may be delegated to qualified employees of the department.

The department may receive grants-in-aid from any agency of the United States and may cooperate and enter into agreements with any agency of the United States, with any other agency of this state or its political subdivisions, or with any agency of another state to further the implementation of this article, secure uniformity of regulations, prevent duplication of enforcement efforts, and facilitate the sharing of information developed in the investigation of unlawful business practices.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1387, § 1, effective April 12.

35-33-107. Exemptions.

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 513, § 8, effective April 16, 2009.)

Any person who holds an establishment number issued by the United States department of agriculture for purposes of inspection and does not engage in the custom processing of meat animals shall be exempt from the requirements of this article.

Any religious practice involving the ritual slaughter, handling, or preparation of meat animals is exempt from the provisions of this article except section 35-33-203 governing methods of slaughter.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 31, § 3, effective July 1, 1995.)

A producer who raises and slaughters no more than one thousand poultry during each calendar year is exempt from the provisions of this article other than the record-keeping requirement in section 35-33-202 and the labeling requirements in section 35-33-301 if:

The producer does not buy or sell poultry products other than those produced from poultry raised on the producer's own farm;

The poultry do not move in interstate commerce;

The poultry are properly labeled; and

The poultry are healthy when slaughtered and the slaughter and processing are conducted under sanitary standards, practices, and procedures that produce poultry products that are sound, clean, and fit for use as human food when distributed by the producer.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1387, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 91:

(5) added, p. 690, § 67, effective April 20.

L. 95:

(3) and (5) amended, p. 31, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) repealed, p. 1909, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2) and (3) amended, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 513, § 8, effective April 16.

L. 2016:

(6) added, (SB 16-058), ch. 158, p. 500, § 4, effective May 4.

35-33-108. Operators not warehousemen. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1388, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 513, § 9, effective April 16.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 35-33-109 as it existed prior to 1989.